Hawaii, session 2025, HB919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that section 174C-101(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, requires decisions of the commission on water resource management to incorporate and protect adequate reserves of water for current and foreseeable development and use of Hawaiian home lands. The purpose of this Act is to add the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or the chairperson's designee, to the commission on water resource management in a similar ex officio membership as the director of health or the director's designee. SECTION 2.  Section 174C-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  There [is] shall be established within the department a commission on water resource management consisting of [seven] eight members which shall have exclusive jurisdiction and final authority in all matters relating to implementation and administration of the state water code, except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter. (b)  Five members shall be appointed by the governor subject to confirmation by the senate in the manner prescribed in subsection (d).  Each [member] of these five members shall have substantial experience in the area of water resource management; provided that at least one member shall have substantial experience or expertise in traditional Hawaiian water resource management techniques and in traditional Hawaiian riparian usage such as those preserved by section 174C-101.  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources shall be the chairperson of the commission.  The director of health and chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or [the director's designee] their respective designees, shall serve as [an] ex officio[[],[]] voting [member.] members." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________